California statutes. Penal Code
(b) Any person who personally inflicts great bodily injury on any person other than an accomplice in the commission of a felony or attempted felony which causes the victim to become comatose due to brain injury or to suffer paralysis of a permanent nature shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for five years. As used in this subdivision, “paralysis” means a major or complete loss of motor function resulting from injury to the nervous system or to a muscular
 mechanism.

(c) Any person who personally inflicts great bodily injury on a person who is 70 years of age or older, other than an accomplice, in the commission of a felony or attempted felony shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for five years.

(d) Any person who personally inflicts great bodily injury on a child under the age of five years in the commission of a felony or attempted felony shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for four, five, or six years.

(e) Any person who personally inflicts great bodily injury under circumstances involving domestic violence in the commission of a felony or attempted felony shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for three,
 four, or five years. As used in this subdivision, “domestic violence” has the meaning provided in subdivision (b) of Section 13700.

(f) (1) As used in this section, “great bodily injury” means a significant or substantial physical injury.

(2) As used in this section, a person who sells, furnishes, administers, or gives away a controlled substance is deemed to have personally inflicted great bodily injury when the person to whom the substance was sold, furnished, administered, or given suffers a significant or substantial physical injury from using the substance.

(g) This section shall not apply to murder or manslaughter or a violation of Section 451 or 452. Subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d) shall not apply if infliction of great bodily injury is an element of the offense.

(h) The court shall impose the additional terms of imprisonment under subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), but may not impose more than one of those terms for the same offense.

(History: Amended November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 36, Sec. 13.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 36 at the November 5, 2024, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.75.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who, for the purpose of committing a felony, administers by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, any controlled substance listed in Section 11054, 11055, 11056, 11057, or 11058 of the Health and Safety Code, against the victim’s will by means of force, violence, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury to the victim or another person, shall, in addition and consecutive to the penalty provided for the felony or attempted felony of which he or she has been convicted, be punished by an additional term of three years.

(b) (1) Any person who, in the commission or attempted commission
 of any offense specified in paragraph (2), administers any controlled substance listed in Section 11054, 11055, 11056, 11057, or 11058 of the Health and Safety Code to the victim shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for five years.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to the following offenses:

(A) Rape, in violation of paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 261.

(B) Sodomy, in violation of subdivision (f) or (i) of Section 286.

(C) Oral copulation, in violation of subdivision (f) or (i) of Section
 287 or of former Section 288a.

(D) Sexual penetration, in violation of subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 289.

(E) Any offense specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.61.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 115.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Note: Section 12022.75 was amended on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.8.

A person who inflicts great bodily injury, as defined in Section 12022.7, on a victim in a violation of Section 220 involving a specified sexual offense, or a violation or attempted violation of paragraph (2), (3), or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 261, paragraph (1), (2), or (4) of subdivision (a) of former Section 262, Section 264.1, subdivision (b) of Section 288, subdivision (a) of Section 289, or sodomy or oral copulation by force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the victim or another person as provided in Section 286 or 287, or former Section 288a, shall receive a five-year enhancement for each violation in addition to the sentence provided for the felony conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 66.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.85.

(a) A person who violates one or more of the offenses listed in subdivision (b) with knowledge that the person has acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS) or with the knowledge that the person carries antibodies of the human immunodeficiency virus at the time of the commission of those offenses shall receive a three-year enhancement for each violation in addition to the sentence provided under those sections.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to the following crimes:

(1) Rape in violation of Section 261 or former Section 262.

(2) Unlawful intercourse with a person under 18 years of age in violation of Section 261.5.

(3) Sodomy in violation of Section 286.

(4) Oral copulation in violation of Section 287 or former Section 288a.

(c) For purposes of proving the knowledge requirement of this section, the prosecuting attorney may use test results received under subdivision (c) of Section 1202.1 or subdivision (g) of Section 1202.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 67.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.9.

Any person who, during the commission of a felony or attempted felony, knows or reasonably should know that the victim is pregnant, and who, with intent to inflict injury, and without the consent of the woman, personally inflicts injury upon a pregnant woman that results in the termination of the pregnancy shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for five years. The additional term provided in this subdivision shall not be imposed unless the fact of that injury is charged in the accusatory pleading and admitted or found to be true by the trier of fact.Nothing in this section shall be construed as
 affecting the applicability of subdivision (a) of Section 187.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 510) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 62.   (AB 117)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Amending action (succeeding the addition by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711) operative October 1, 2011, pursuant to Secs. 68 and 69 of Ch. 39.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.95.

Any person convicted of a violation of Section 273a, who under circumstances or conditions likely to produce great bodily harm or death, willfully causes or permits any child to suffer, or inflicts thereon unjustifiable physical pain or injury that results in death, or having the care or custody of any child, under circumstances likely to produce great bodily harm or death, willfully causes or permits that child to be injured or harmed, and that injury or harm results in death, shall receive a four-year enhancement for each violation, in addition to the sentence provided for that conviction. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as affecting the applicability of subdivision (a) of Section 187 or Section 192. This section shall not apply unless the allegation is included within
 an accusatory pleading and admitted by the defendant or found to be true by the trier of fact.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 5.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 3. CRIMINAL STATISTICS [13000. - 13400.]



  CHAPTER 1. Department Of Justice [13000. - 13023.]



  ARTICLE 1. Duties of the Department [13000. - 13015.]

13000.

(a) All statewide automated fingerprint identification systems shall be maintained by the Department of Justice. For purposes of this section, “automated fingerprint identification system” means electronic comparison of fingerprints to a data base of known persons.

(b) Any state agency is exempted from this section if the agency’s director finds that the automated identification system needed to meet programmatic requirements is less costly than an identical system available through an interagency agreement with the Department of Justice, or is not provided by the Department of Justice.

(c) Information contained in these systems shall be released to state agencies only on a need-to-know basis pursuant to any of the following:

(1) Statutory authorization to the extent permitted by federal law.

(2) A court order or decision that requires release of the information.

(3) An interagency agreement with the Department of Justice to develop and operate a system.

(d) The department may charge a fee to be paid by the agency for the actual cost of supporting the service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

13010.

It shall be the duty of the department:

(a) To collect data necessary for the work of the department from all persons and agencies mentioned in Section 13020 and from any other appropriate source.

(b) To prepare and distribute to all those persons and agencies cards, forms, or electronic means used in reporting data to the department. The cards, forms, or electronic means may, in
 addition to other items, include items of information needed by federal bureaus or departments engaged in the development of national and uniform criminal statistics.

(c) To recommend the form and content of records that must be kept by those persons and agencies in order to ensure the correct reporting of data to the department.

(d) To instruct those persons and agencies in the installation, maintenance, and use of those records and in the reporting of data therefrom to the department.

(e) To process, tabulate, analyze, and interpret the data collected from those persons and agencies.

(f) To supply, at their request, to federal bureaus or
 departments engaged in the collection of national criminal statistics data they need from this state.

(g) To make available to the public, through the department’s OpenJustice Web portal, information relating to criminal statistics, to be updated at least once per year, and to present at other times as the Attorney General may approve reports on special aspects of criminal statistics. A sufficient number of copies of a downloadable summary of this information shall be annually prepared to enable the Attorney General to send a copy to the Governor and to all public officials in the state dealing with criminals and to distribute them generally in channels where they
 will add to the public enlightenment. This subdivision shall not be construed to require more frequent reporting by local agencies than what is required by any other law.

(h) To periodically review the requirements of units of government using criminal justice statistics, and to make recommendations for changes it deems necessary in the design of criminal justice statistics systems, including new techniques of collection and processing made possible by automation.

(i) To evaluate, on an annual basis, the progress of California’s transition from summary crime reporting to incident-based crime reporting, in alignment with the federal National Incident-Based Reporting System, and report its findings to the Legislature annually through 2019, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 418, Sec. 5.   (AB 2524)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13010.5.

(a) The department shall collect data pertaining to the juvenile justice system for criminal history and statistical purposes. This information shall serve to assist the department, through its bureau whose mission is to protect the rights of children, in complying with the reporting requirement of paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 13012, measuring the extent of juvenile delinquency, determining the need for, and effectiveness of, relevant legislation, and identifying long-term trends in juvenile delinquency. Any data collected pursuant to this section may include criminal history information that may be used by the department to comply with the requirements of Section 602.5 of the
 Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) Statistical data collected pursuant to this section shall be made available to the public through the OpenJustice Web portal. The department may make available data collected pursuant to this section in the same manner as data collected pursuant to Section 13202.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 418, Sec. 6.   (AB 2524)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13011.

The department may serve as statistical and research agency to the Department of Corrections, the Board of Prison Terms, the Board of Corrections, the Department of the Youth Authority, and the Youthful Offender Parole Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 860.)
-------------------------------------------

13012.

(a) The information published on the OpenJustice Web portal pursuant to Section 13010 shall contain statistics showing all of the following:

(1) The amount and the types of offenses known to the public authorities.

(2) The personal and social characteristics of criminals and delinquents.

(3) The administrative actions taken by law enforcement, judicial, penal, and correctional agencies or institutions, including those in the juvenile justice system, in dealing with criminals or delinquents.

(4) The administrative actions taken by law enforcement, prosecutorial, judicial, penal, and correctional agencies or institutions, including those in the juvenile justice system, in dealing with minors who are the subject of a petition or hearing in the juvenile court to transfer their case to the jurisdiction of an adult criminal court or whose cases are directly filed or otherwise initiated in an adult criminal court.

(5) (A) The total number of each of the following:

(i) Civilian complaints received by law enforcement agencies under Section 832.5.

(ii) Civilian complaints alleging criminal conduct of either a felony or a misdemeanor.

(iii) Civilian complaints alleging racial or identity profiling, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 13519.4. These statistics shall be disaggregated by the specific type of racial or identity profiling alleged, including, but not limited to, based on a consideration of race, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, or mental or physical disability.

(B) The statistics reported pursuant to this paragraph shall provide, for each category of complaint identified under subparagraph (A), the number of complaints within each of the following disposition categories:

(i) “Sustained,” which means that the investigation disclosed sufficient evidence to prove the truth of allegation in the complaint by preponderance
 of the evidence.

(ii) “Exonerated,” which means that the investigation clearly established that the actions of the personnel that formed the basis of the complaint are not a violation of law or agency policy.

(iii) “Not sustained,” which means that the investigation failed to disclose sufficient evidence to clearly prove or disprove the allegation in the complaint.

(iv) “Unfounded,” which means that the investigation clearly established that the allegation is not true.

(C) The reports under subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall be made available to the public and disaggregated for each individual law enforcement agency.

(b) The department shall give adequate interpretation of the statistics and present the information so that it may be of value in guiding the policies of the Legislature and of those in charge of the apprehension, prosecution, and treatment of criminals and delinquents, or those concerned with the prevention of crime and delinquency. This interpretation shall be presented in clear and informative formats on the OpenJustice Web portal. The Web portal shall also include statistics that are comparable with national uniform criminal statistics published by federal bureaus or departments.

(c) Each year, on an annual basis, the Racial and Identity Profiling Advisory Board (RIPA), established pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (j) of Section 13519.4, shall analyze the statistics reported pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and
 (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of this section. RIPA’s analysis of the complaints shall be incorporated into its annual report as required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (j) of Section 13519.4 and shall be published on the OpenJustice Web portal. The reports shall not disclose the identity of peace officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 328, Sec. 2.   (AB 1518)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13012.4.

(a) The annual report published by the department under Section 13010 shall, in regard to the contents required by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 13012, include the annual number of minors placed on electronic monitoring, as defined in Section 628.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, including all of the following information for each minor:

(1) The total number of days in a calendar year that the minor was subject to electronic monitoring.

(2) The total number of days in a calendar year that the minor was detained in juvenile hall for a violation of a term of the minor’s electronic
 monitoring contract not amounting to a new violation of law.

(3) For which of the following reasons was the minor placed or reinstated on electronic monitoring:

(A) A new violation of law.

(B) A violation of a court order not amounting to a new violation of law.

(C) A violation of a term of the minor’s electronic monitoring contract not covered by subparagraph (A) or (B).

(4) For which of the following reasons was a minor on electronic monitoring detained in juvenile hall:

(A) A new violation of law.

(B) A violation of a court order not amounting to a new violation of law.

(C) A violation of a term of the minor’s electronic monitoring contract not covered by subparagraph (A) or (B).

(5) All of the information described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, shall be cross-referenced with information about the age, gender, ethnicity, and offense of the minors subject to these court actions.

(b) The department’s annual report published under Section 13010 shall include the information described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 13012, as further delineated by this section, beginning with the report due on July 1,
 2026, for the preceding calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 796, Sec. 2.   (AB 2658)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13012.5.

(a) The annual report published by the department under Section 13010 shall, in regard to the contents required by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 13012, include the following statewide information:

(1) The annual number of fitness hearings held in the juvenile courts under Section 707 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the outcomes of those hearings including orders to remand to adult criminal court,
 cross-referenced with information about the age, gender, ethnicity, and offense of the minors whose cases are the subject of those fitness hearings.

(2) The annual number of minors whose cases are filed directly in adult criminal court under Sections 602.5 and 707 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, cross-referenced with information about the age, gender, ethnicity, and offense of the minors whose cases are filed directly to the adult criminal court.

(3) The outcomes of cases involving minors who are prosecuted in adult criminal courts, regardless of how adult court jurisdiction was initiated, including whether the minor was acquitted or convicted, or whether the case was dismissed and returned to juvenile court, including sentencing outcomes, cross-referenced with the age, gender, ethnicity, and offense of the minors subject to these court actions.

(b) The department’s annual report published under Section 13010 shall include the information described in
 paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 13012, as further delineated by this section, beginning with the report due on July 1, 2003, for the preceding calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 99, Sec. 6.   (AB 1953)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13012.6.

The data published by the department on the OpenJustice Web portal pursuant to Section 13010 shall include information concerning arrests for violations of Section 530.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 418, Sec. 8.   (AB 2524)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13012.7.

(a) The annual report published by the department pursuant to Section 13010, commencing with the report that includes data from 2022, shall, to the extent the data is available, include statistics on lewd or lascivious felonies
 consistent with those reported for rape, including the number of offenses reported and the rate per 100,000 population.

(b) For purposes of this section, “lewd or lascivious felonies” means conduct prohibited by Sections 220, 266j, subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 288, and subdivision (a) of Section 288.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   (SB 259)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13012.8.

The annual report published by the department pursuant to Section 13010 shall include information concerning arrests for violations of Section 597.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 237, Sec. 1.   (SB 1200)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13012.9.

The information published on the OpenJustice Web portal pursuant to Section 13010 shall include information concerning arrests for violations of Section 236.1 and the number of individuals reported as a victim of human trafficking, as defined in Section 236.1, through the California Incident-Based Reporting System.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 393, Sec. 1.   (AB 1239)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13013.

The department shall maintain a data set, updated annually, that contains the number of crimes reported, number of clearances, and clearance rates in California as reported by individual law enforcement agencies. The data set shall be made available through the OpenJustice Web portal. This section shall not be construed to require reporting any crimes other than those required by Section 13012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 418, Sec. 9.   (AB 2524)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13014.

(a) The Department of Justice shall perform the following duties concerning the investigation and prosecution of homicide cases:

(1) Collect information, as specified in subdivision (b), on all persons who are the victims of, and all persons who are charged with, homicide.

(2) Adopt and distribute, as a written form or by electronic
 means, to all state and governmental entities that are responsible for the investigation and prosecution of homicide cases, forms that will include information to be provided to the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) Compile, collate, index, and maintain an electronic file of the information required by subdivision (b). The file shall be available to the general public during the normal business hours of the department, as well as on the OpenJustice Web portal, and the department shall
 at least annually update the information required by this section, which shall also be available to the general public.

The department shall perform the duties specified in this subdivision within its existing budget.

(b) Every state or local governmental entity responsible for the investigation and prosecution of a homicide case shall provide the department with demographic information about the victim and the person or persons charged with the crime, including age, gender, race, and ethnic background.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 418, Sec. 10.   (AB 2524)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13015.

(a) The Department of Justice shall submit a plan for the replacement of the Juvenile Court and Probation Statistical System (JCPSS) with a modern database and reporting system. The plan shall be submitted to the Assembly and Senate budget subcommittees on public safety, and the Assembly and Senate Public Safety Committees by January 1, 2023.

(b) In devising the plan, the department shall convene a working group consisting of key stakeholders and experts, including, but not limited to, representatives from the Juvenile Justice Data Working Group established within the Board of State and Community Corrections pursuant to Section 6032, agencies that are responsible for the collection and submission of juvenile justice data to department, advocates
 with experience in the collection, analysis, and utilization of juvenile justice data in California, academic institutions or research organizations with experience in collecting, analyzing, or using juvenile justice data in California, and people directly impacted by the justice system.

(c) The plan shall consider the relevant findings and recommendations submitted by the Juvenile Justice Data Working Group in their January 2016 final report. The plan shall, at minimum, include the following:

(1) An overall description of the goals of the new data system.

(2) A description of all data elements proposed to be captured by the new system, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) All data elements currently capture by JCPSS that are to be
 retained.

(B) Data and outcome measures needed to produce, at minimum, recidivism reports for youth organized by age, gender identity, race, ethnicity, and other demographic factors.

(C) Data and outcome measures needed to document caseload and placement changes due to the realignment of the state Division of Juvenile Justice to counties.

(D) How the revised system will document all of the following:

(i) Subsequent referrals to the justice system for violations of probation and warrants.

(ii) The use of preadjudication and postadjudication detention, including length of stay.

(iii) The use of detention alternatives, such as
 electronic monitoring, house arrest, or home supervision.

(iv) Dispositional placement outcomes by facility type, including length of stay in facilities. “Facility type” includes juvenile halls, group homes, foster care, county camp or ranch, and local facilities developed as an alternative to Division of Juvenile Justice facilities.

(3) The use of individual unique identifiers.

(4) An analysis of what features must be included to allow users to access and analyze data easily through standard or customized reports, and an analysis of how system data can be made publicly available on the department’s internet website.

(5) A discussion of how the new system can be designed to ensure that it may be modified in the future to reflect relevant changes to the
 juvenile justice system.

(6) An analysis of how this new system may impact state and local agencies that provide the department with data for inclusion in JCPSS, including an assessment of how state and local data systems may need to be modified to ensure that comprehensive and high-quality data is collected and transmitted to the department.

(7) Major challenges or obstacles, if any, to implementing a new system and recommendations for addressing those challenges.

(8) A cost estimate or estimates for the new system and for implementing and funding a new system. These recommendations may include, but are not limited to, a phased implementation approach, providing various options based on a system with differing data capabilities, or providing funding recommendations based on specific system components.

(10) A projected implementation timeline.

(d) The plan shall also include an assessment of the operational and fiscal feasibility of including both of the following capacities in the new system:

(1) Adult court dispositions of youth.

(2) Youth development and wellness data including, but not limited to, education attainment, employment, mental health, housing, family connections, foster care, and other wellness outcomes as recommended by the Juvenile Justice Data Working Group in their January 2016 final report.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 337, Sec. 15.   (SB 823)   Effective September 30, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Duties of Public Agencies and Officers [13020. - 13023.]

13020.

It shall be the duty of every city marshal, chief of police, railroad and steamship police, sheriff, coroner, district attorney, city attorney and city prosecutor having criminal jurisdiction, probation officer, county board of parole commissioners, work furlough administrator, the Department of Justice, Health and Welfare Agency, Department of Corrections, Department of Youth Authority, Youthful Offender Parole Board, Board of Prison Terms, State Department of Health, Department of Benefit Payments, State Fire Marshal, Liquor Control Administrator, constituent agencies of the State Department of Investment, and every other person or agency dealing with crimes or criminals or with delinquency or delinquents, when requested by the Attorney General:

(a) To install and maintain records needed for the correct reporting of statistical data required by him or her.

(b) To report statistical data to the department at those times and in the manner that the Attorney General prescribes.

(c) To give to the Attorney General, or his or her accredited agent, access to statistical data for the purpose of carrying out this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 126.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13020.5.

(a) Records and data reported in alignment with the federal National Incident-Based Reporting system, pursuant to Sections 13010 and 13020, shall be disaggregated by whether an incident occurred in Indian country.

(b) As used in this section, the term “Indian country” has the same meaning as in Section 1151 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 662, Sec. 2.   (AB 2695)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13021.

Local law enforcement agencies shall report to the Department of Justice such information as the Attorney General may by regulation require relative to misdemeanor violations of Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 311) of Title 9 of Part 1 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

13022.

Each sheriff and chief of police shall annually furnish the Department of Justice, in the manner prescribed by the Attorney General, a report of all justifiable homicides committed in his or her jurisdiction. In cases where both a sheriff and chief of police would be required to report a justifiable homicide under this section, only the chief of police shall report the homicide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 405, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

13023.

(a) This section shall be subject to the availability of adequate funding.

(b) (1) The Attorney General shall direct state and local law enforcement agencies to report to the Department of Justice, in a manner to be prescribed by the Attorney General, any information that may be required relative to hate crimes.

(2) The Attorney General shall review state and local agencies’ formal policies on hate crimes required by Section 422.87 and the hate crime brochure required pursuant to Section 422.92. The department shall review the policies and brochures for compliance with law. The department shall instruct any agency that did not submit a policy or brochure, or that submitted a
 legally noncompliant policy or brochure, to submit compliant documents.

(c) (1) Law enforcement agencies are required to submit the hate crime documents required by the Attorney General as follows:

(A) On or before January 1, 2025, each law enforcement agency in the Counties of Los Angeles, Orange, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, and Ventura shall produce their hate crime materials to the Department of Justice.

(B) On or before January 1, 2026, each law enforcement agency in the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Del Norte, Humboldt, Lake, Marin, Mendocino, Monterey, Napa, San Benito, San Francisco, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Solano, and Sonoma shall produce their hate crime materials to the Department of Justice.

(C) On
 or before January 1, 2027, each law enforcement agency in the Counties of Colusa, Glenn, Lassen, Modoc, Nevada, Plumas, Shasta, Sierra, Siskiyou, Sutter, Tehama, Trinity, Yuba, Alpine, Amador, Calaveras, El Dorado, Placer, Sacramento, San Joaquin, Stanislaus, Tuolumne, and Yolo and the special districts of the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Department of State Hospitals, and the state park system shall produce their hate crime materials to the Department of Justice.

(D) On or before January 1, 2028, each law enforcement agency in the Counties of Fresno, Kern, Kings, Madera, Mariposa, Merced, Tulare, Imperial, Inyo, Mono, Riverside, San Bernardino, and San Diego shall produce their hate crime materials to the Department of Justice.

(2) The production of hate crime materials pursuant to paragraph (1) shall proceed
 on a four-year schedule and shall be ongoing. All law enforcement agencies, including special districts, shall produce to the Attorney General’s office their hate crime materials on the specified date listed above, and then every four years thereafter in perpetuity.

(d) On or before July 1 of each year, the Department of Justice shall update the OpenJustice Web portal with the information obtained from law enforcement agencies pursuant to this section. The information shall include the names of agencies that submitted compliant policies and brochures, including any agency that submitted revised compliant documents. The department shall submit its analysis of this information to the Legislature in the manner described in subdivision (g) of Section 13010.

 (e) Law enforcement agencies shall additionally post the information required in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) to their
 internet websites on a monthly basis.

(f) For purposes of this section, “hate crime” has the same meaning as in Section 422.55.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 524, Sec. 2.   (AB 449)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Reports to the Bureau of Livestock Identification [13050. - 13051.]

13050.

Each sheriff or other officer to whom a complaint that relates to the loss or theft of any equine animal is made shall, in a timely manner, transmit to the Bureau of Livestock Identification a report pursuant to Section 24104 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 431, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

13051.

The Bureau of Livestock Identification shall compile a report on information received pursuant to Section 24104 of the Food and Agricultural Code. The bureau shall distribute the report to all county sheriffs’ departments in a timely manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 431, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Criminal Offender Record Information [13100. - 13370.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings and Definitions [13100. - 13104.]

13100.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) That the criminal justice agencies in this state require, for the performance of their official duties, accurate and reasonably complete criminal offender record information.

(b) That the Legislature and other governmental policymaking or policy-researching bodies, and criminal justice agency management units require greatly improved aggregate information for the performance of their duties.

(c) That policing agencies and courts require speedy access to information concerning all felony and selected misdemeanor arrests and final dispositions of such cases.

(d) That criminal justice agencies may require regular access to detailed criminal histories relating to any felony arrest that is followed by the filing of a complaint.

(e) That, in order to achieve the above improvements, the recording, reporting, storage, analysis, and dissemination of criminal offender record information in this state must be made more uniform and efficient, and better controlled and coordinated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

13100.1.

(a) The Attorney General shall appoint an advisory committee to the California-Criminal Index and Identification (Cal-CII) system to assist in the ongoing management of the system with respect to operating policies, criminal records content, and records retention. The committee shall serve at the pleasure of the Attorney General, without compensation, except for reimbursement of necessary expenses.

(b) The committee shall consist of the following representatives:

(1) One representative from the California Police Chiefs’ Association.

(2) One representative from
 the California Peace Officers’ Association.

(3) Three representatives from the California State Sheriffs’ Association.

(4) One trial judge appointed by the Judicial Council.

(5) One representative from the California District Attorneys Association.

(6) One representative from the California Court Clerks’ Association.

(7) One representative from the Office of Emergency Services.

(8) One representative from the Chief Probation Officers’ Association.

(9) One
 representative from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(10) One representative from the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(11) One member of the public, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, who is knowledgeable and experienced in the process of utilizing background clearances.

(12) One member of the public, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, who is knowledgeable and experienced in the process of utilizing background clearances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 426.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13100.2.

(a) The designee of the Attorney General shall serve as chair of the committee.

(b) The Department of Justice shall provide staff and support for the committee.
